Washington statutes.
RCW 36.68.590

Purpose—Level of services—General park programs.

The purpose of RCW 36.68.400 et seq. shall be to provide a higher level of park services and shall not in any way diminish the right of a county to provide a general park program financed from current expense funds.

[ 1963 c 218 s 20.]